Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2602
Terms, defined.

In the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents
Act:

(1) Agency contract means
an agreement in which a student-athlete authorizes a person to negotiate or
solicit on behalf of the student-athlete a professional-sports-services contract
or an endorsement contract;

(2) Athlete agent means an individual who enters into
an agency contract with a student-athlete or, directly or indirectly, recruits
or solicits a student-athlete to enter into an agency contract. The term includes
an individual who represents to the public that the individual is an athlete
agent. The term does not include a spouse, parent, sibling, grandparent, or
guardian of the student-athlete or an individual acting solely on behalf of
a professional sports team or professional sports organization;

(3) Athletic director
means an individual responsible for administering the overall athletic program
of an educational institution or, if an educational institution has separately
administered athletic programs for male students and female students, the
athletic program for males or the athletic program for females, as appropriate;

(4) Contact means a communication,
direct or indirect, between an athlete agent and a student-athlete, to recruit
or solicit the student-athlete to enter into an agency contract;

(5) Endorsement contract
means an agreement under which a student-athlete is employed or receives consideration
to use on behalf of the other party any value that the student-athlete may
have because of publicity, reputation, following, or fame obtained because
of athletic ability or performance;

(6) Intercollegiate sport means a sport played at
the collegiate level for which eligibility requirements for participation
by a student-athlete are established by a national association for the promotion
or regulation of collegiate athletics;

(7) Person means an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, or government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality;
public corporation; or any other legal or commercial entity;

(8) Professional-sports-services
contract means an agreement under which an individual is employed, or agrees
to render services, as a player on a professional sports team, with a professional
sports organization, or as a professional athlete;

(9) Record means information that
is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

(10) Registration means registration
as an athlete agent pursuant to the act;

(11) State means a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United
States; and

(12)
Student-athlete means an individual who engages in, is eligible to engage
in, or may be eligible in the future to engage in, any intercollegiate sport.
If an individual is permanently ineligible to participate in a particular
intercollegiate sport, the individual is not a student-athlete for purposes
of that sport.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 2.